Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-136
Certificate of approval; restricted landing area for personal use; exception.

The provisions of sections 3-133 to 3-135 shall not apply to restricted landing areas designed for personal use.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 9(9), p. 95.

This section specifically exempts from licensing requirements restricted landing areas designed for personal use and therefore the Department of Aeronautics is without authority to issue licenses for such landing areas. Nebraska Public Power Dist. v. Huebner, 202 Neb. 587, 276 N.W.2d 228 (1979).